Indiana, session 2026, HB1071.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 21-12-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.234-2015,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. Money in the fund must be used to provide
annual tuition scholarships to qualified scholarship applicants who
enroll as full-time students as described in section 6 or 7 of this
chapter at a postsecondary educational institution that qualifies for
participation in the program under section 4 of this chapter, unless it is
transferred to another fund under this article at the direction of the
commission under IC 21-12-1.2-2.
SECTION 2. IC 21-12-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 119, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A student may apply to the
commission for a scholarship. To qualify for a scholarship, the student
must meet the following requirements:
(1) Be an eligible student who qualified to participate in the
program under section 5 of this chapter.
(2) Be a resident of Indiana.
2026 IN 1071—LS 6134/DI 110


(3) Be a graduate from a secondary school located in Indiana that
meets the admission criteria of an eligible institution and have
achieved a cumulative grade point average in high school of:
(A) at least 2.0 on a 4.0 grading scale, if the student is
expected to graduate from high school before July 1, 2014; and
(B) at least 2.5 on a 4.0 grading scale, if the student is
expected to graduate from high school after June 30, 2014.
(4) Except as provided under subsection (c), have applied to
attend and be accepted to attend as a full-time student an eligible
institution.
(5) Certify in writing that before the student's graduation from
high school the student:
(A) did not illegally use controlled substances (as defined in
IC 35-48-1.1-7);
(B) did not illegally consume alcoholic beverages;
(C) did not commit any other crime or a delinquent act (as
described in IC 31-37-1-2 or IC 31-37-2-2 through
IC 31-37-2-5 (or IC 31-6-4-1(a)(1) through IC 31-6-4-1(a)(5)
before their repeal));
(D) timely filed an application for other types of financial
assistance available to the student from the state or federal
government; and
(E) completed an academic success program required under
the rules adopted by the commission.
(6) Submit to the commission all the information and evidence
required by the commission to determine eligibility as a
scholarship applicant.
(7) This subdivision applies only to applicants who initially enroll
in the program under section 5 of this chapter or IC 21-12-6.5-2
after June 30, 2011. For purposes of this chapter, applicants who
are enrolled in the program before July 1, 2011, will not have an
income or financial resources test applied to them when they
subsequently apply for a scholarship. Have a lack of financial
resources reasonably available to the applicant, as defined by the
commission, that, in the absence of an award under this chapter,
would deter the scholarship applicant from completing the
applicant's education at the approved postsecondary educational
institution that the applicant has selected and that has accepted
the applicant.
(8) Meet any other minimum criteria established by the
commission.
(b) This section applies to an individual who graduates from high
2026 IN 1071—LS 6134/DI 110


school after December 31, 2011. To be eligible for a scholarship under
this section, a student must initially attend an eligible institution
described in subsection (a)(4) not later than the fall semester (or its
equivalent, as determined by the commission) in the year immediately
following the year in which the student graduates from high school.
(c) The commission may allow a student who is otherwise
ineligible under subsection (a)(4) to be eligible for a scholarship if
the:
(1) student submits a petition to the commission; and
(2) commission makes a determination that the student is a
student with a disability as defined in the federal Americans
With Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. 12102) for whom a reduced
course load has been determined appropriate by the
applicable eligible institution.
SECTION 3. IC 21-12-6-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.215-2018(ss),
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Subject to IC 21-12-13-2, a scholarship
awarded under section 6 of this chapter or this section may be renewed.
To qualify for a scholarship renewal, a scholarship recipient must do
the following:
(1) Submit to the commission a renewal application that contains
all the information and evidence required by the commission to
determine eligibility for the scholarship renewal.
(2) Subject to subsection (d), continue to be enrolled as a
full-time student in good standing at an eligible institution.
(3) This subdivision applies only to applicants who initially enroll
in the program under section 5 of this chapter or IC 21-12-6.5-2
after June 30, 2011. For purposes of this chapter, applicants who
are enrolled in the program before July 1, 2011, will not have an
income or financial resources test applied to them when they
subsequently apply to renew a scholarship. Continue to have a
lack of financial resources reasonably available to the applicant,
as defined by the commission, that, in the absence of an award
under this chapter, would deter the scholarship applicant from
completing the applicant's education at the approved
postsecondary educational institution that the applicant has
selected and that has accepted the applicant.
(4) Maintain satisfactory academic progress, as determined by the
eligible institution.
(5) If the student initially enrolls in an eligible institution for an
academic year beginning after August 31, 2019, complete a
student success program designed by the commission in
2026 IN 1071—LS 6134/DI 110


coordination with eligible institutions.
(6) Beginning in an academic year beginning after August 31,
2017, the student successfully completes:
(A) at least thirty (30) credit hours or the equivalent during the
last academic year in which the student received state financial
aid; or
(B) at least thirty (30) credit hours or the equivalent during the
last academic year in which the student was enrolled in
postsecondary education.
(7) Continue to meet any other minimum criteria established by
the commission.
(b) In determining eligibility under subsection (a)(6), the
commission shall apply all the following types of credits regardless of
whether the credits were completed during the last academic year
described in subsection (a)(6)(A) or (a)(6)(B):
(1) Credits earned from dual credit, advanced placement,
Cambridge International, and international baccalaureate courses.
(2) College credits earned during high school.
(3) Credits earned exceeding thirty (30) credit hours during a
previous academic year in which a student received state financial
aid.
(c) The commission may allow a student who is otherwise ineligible
under subsection (a)(6) for an award during the next academic year to
maintain eligibility for an award if the student submits a petition to the
commission and the commission makes a determination that:
(1) extenuating circumstances (as determined by the commission)
prevented the student from meeting the requirements under
subsection (a)(6); or
(2) the student is a student with a disability as defined in the
federal Americans With Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. 12102) for
whom a reduced course load has been determined appropriate
by the applicable eligible institution.
(d) The commission may allow a student who is otherwise
ineligible under subsection (a)(2) for an award during an academic
year to maintain eligibility for an award if the:
(1) student submits a petition to the commission; and
(2) commission makes a determination that the student is:
(A) a student with a disability as defined in the federal
Americans With Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. 12102) for
whom a reduced course load has been determined
appropriate by the applicable eligible institution; and
(B) in good standing with the applicable eligible institution.
2026 IN 1071—LS 6134/DI 110


SECTION 4. IC 21-12-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.281-2013,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided under subsection (b),
a scholarship may be renewed under this chapter for a total scholarship
award that does not exceed the number of academic terms that
constitutes four (4) undergraduate academic years.
(b) A scholarship may be renewed under this chapter for a
student described in section 6(c) or 7(d) of this chapter for the
number of academic terms that constitutes eight (8) undergraduate
academic years. However, the total amount awarded to a
scholarship applicant under this chapter may not exceed an
amount that is equal to the total award amount that the
scholarship applicant would be eligible to receive under section
10.3 of this chapter for the number of academic terms that
constitutes four (4) undergraduate academic years.
SECTION 5. IC 21-12-6-10.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.52-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.3. (a) This section applies to a student who
qualifies for a scholarship under section 6 or 7 of this chapter, if the
student initially enrolls in the program after June 30, 2011. Applicants
who are enrolled in the program before July 1, 2011, will not have an
income or financial resources test applied to them under this section
when they subsequently apply for a scholarship or apply to renew a
scholarship.
(b) A scholarship applicant shall be awarded the following amount
as adjusted under subsections (c) and (d):
(1) If the scholarship applicant attends an approved postsecondary
educational institution that is a state educational institution, the
full educational costs that the scholarship applicant would
otherwise be required to pay at the eligible institution.
(2) If the scholarship applicant attends an approved postsecondary
educational institution that is private, the greater of the:
(A) average of the educational costs of all state educational
institutions, not including Ivy Tech Community College; or
(B) amount the applicant is eligible to receive under
IC 21-12-4.
(3) If the scholarship applicant attends an approved postsecondary
educational institution that is a postsecondary credit bearing
proprietary educational institution, the lesser of the educational
costs that the scholarship applicant would otherwise be required
to pay at the postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution or the educational costs of Ivy Tech Community
2026 IN 1071—LS 6134/DI 110


College.
However, the amount awarded to an eligible student described in
section 6(c) or 7(d) of this chapter may not be more than the full
educational costs that the scholarship applicant would otherwise be
required to pay at the eligible institution.
(c) The amount of an award under subsection (b) shall be reduced
by:
(1) for an amount awarded before September 1, 2014:
(A) the amount of the Frank O'Bannon grant awarded to the
scholarship applicant; plus
(B) an additional amount based on the federal needs
calculation, if necessary, as determined by the commission, to
provide scholarships within the available appropriation; or
(2) for an amount awarded after August 31, 2014, the amount
based on the federal needs calculation, if necessary, as determined
by the commission, to provide scholarships within the available
appropriation.
(d) The total of all tuition scholarships awarded under this section
in a state fiscal year may not exceed the amount available for
distribution from the fund for scholarships under this chapter. If the
total amount to be distributed from the fund in a state fiscal year
exceeds the amount available for distribution, the amount to be
distributed to each eligible applicant shall be proportionately reduced
so that the total reductions equal the amount of the excess based on the
relative financial need of each eligible applicant.
SECTION 6. IC 21-12-13-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.11-2023,
SECTION 71, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to the following
scholarship and fee remission statutes:
(1) IC 21-12-3.
(2) IC 21-12-4.
(3) IC 21-12-6.
(4) IC 21-13-2.
(5) IC 21-13-7.
(6) IC 21-13-8.
(7) IC 21-13-4.
(8) IC 21-14-5.
(9) IC 21-12-16.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), and except for a
scholarship granted under IC 21-13-8 to an individual described in
IC 21-13-8-1(b)(2)(B), a grant or reduction in tuition or fees, including
all renewals and extensions, under any of the laws listed in subsection
2026 IN 1071—LS 6134/DI 110


(a) may not exceed the number of terms that constitutes:
(1) except as provided in subdivision (2) and IC 21-12-6-8, four
(4) undergraduate academic years, as determined by the
commission; or
(2) for purposes of IC 21-13-4, six (6) academic years as
determined by the commission;
and must be used within eight (8) years after the date the individual
first applies and becomes eligible for benefits under the applicable law.
(c) The commission may, subject to the availability of funds, extend
eligibility under subsection (b) for a recipient who used a grant or
reduction in tuition or fees under any of the statutes listed in subsection
(a) at a postsecondary educational institution that closed. The extension
of eligibility may not exceed the number of terms used by the recipient
at the postsecondary educational institution that closed.
2026 IN 1071—LS 6134/DI 110